Hawaii statutes.
§189-3 Monthly catch report. (a) Upon
the demand of the department, every commercial marine licensee shall furnish to
the department a report or reports with respect to the marine life taken and
any other information the department may require for the purposes of this
section.

(b) Any information submitted to the
department by any person in compliance with any requirement under this section
shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed, except when required under
court order or pursuant to subpoena issued by the department of the attorney
general, or with the prior written consent of the person submitting the
information, or under cooperative agreements with government agencies of the
United States for exchange and use of the information specifically to manage
marine life. The department, by rule, may establish procedures necessary to
preserve the confidentiality, except that the department may release or make
public any of the information in the aggregate or summary form which does not
directly or indirectly disclose the identity of any person who submits
information. [L 1929, c 187, §4; RL 1935, §333; RL 1945, §1258; am L 1947, c
39, §3; am L 1949, c 272, §3; am L 1955, c 96, §4; RL 1955, §21-112; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §189-3; am L 1981, c 85, §80; am L
1985, c 113, §1; am L 1999, c 9, §2]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next